Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB516.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "recreational cabin" in section 103 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Recreational cabin." A structure which is:(1) utilized principally for recreational activity;12345678910111213141516171819 (2) not utilized as a domicile or residence for any individual for any time period;(3) not utilized for commercial purposes, except when located on a recreational campground or State park;(4) not greater than two stories in height, excluding basement;(5) not utilized by the owner or any other person as a place of employment;(6) not a mailing address for bills and correspondence; and(7) not listed as an individual's place of residence on a tax return, driver's license, car registration or voter registration."Recreational campground." As follows:(1) A lodging establishment organized to accommodate five or more separate, designated campsites for shelter in either privately owned or campground-owned lodging. The property may:(i) Include amenities, such as site-specific electric and sewer hookups, public bath houses, convenience stores, recreational areas or pools.(ii) Permit seasonal sites.(iii) Not require seasonal guests to have month-to-month agreements.(iv) Allow approved guests to leave a trailer on the site throughout the year but not maintain a permanent residence.(2) The term does not include a recreational vehicle or tent campsite in a State park.* * *20250HB0516PN0509 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0516PN0509 - 3 - 1